District of Columbia statutes.
44-418

Moratorium on applications.

The SHPDA may impose a moratorium for up to 120 days on the issuance of certificates of need for any specific type of new institutional health service, if the SHPDA requires additional time to develop and adopt criteria and standards for a new institutional health service. A moratorium may not apply to a certificate of need application which is pending before the SHPDA at the time of the imposition of the moratorium. A particular institutional health services may not be the subject of a moratorium more than once within any 12-month period.

Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-191, § 19, 43 DCR 4535
1981 Ed., § 32-368.